Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB358.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title and sections 1 and 5(b) of the act of November 24, 2004 (P.L.1270, No.153), referred to as the Pennsylvania Amber Alert System Law, are amended to read:AN ACTProviding for the Pennsylvania Amber Alert System and the Pennsylvania Green Alert System; authorizing and directing the Pennsylvania State Police to establish and maintain the [Pennsylvania Amber Alert System] alert systems; assessing costs; and providing for immunity and penalties.Section 1. Pennsylvania Amber Alert System [and], Missing Endangered Person Advisory System (MEPAS) and 1234567891011121314151617181920 Pennsylvania Green Alert System established.(a) Pennsylvania Amber Alert System.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall establish and maintain the Pennsylvania Amber Alert System to assist in the recovery of abducted children through prompt notification to the general public, appropriate law enforcement authorities and other public agencies.(b) Missing Endangered Person Advisory System (MEPAS).--The Pennsylvania State Police shall establish and maintain the Missing Endangered Person Advisory System to assist in the recovery of missing persons who are at special risk of harm or injury, through prompt notification to the general public, appropriate law enforcement authorities and other agencies.(c) Pennsylvania Green Alert System.--(1) The Pennsylvania State Police, in consultation with the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, shall establish and maintain the Pennsylvania Green Alert System to notify the public of a missing person who is a veteran at risk.(2) The Pennsylvania Green Alert System shall be operated by the Pennsylvania State Police. Activation may be requested by a law enforcement agency if the law enforcement agency determines that there is reason to believe:(i) the missing individual is a veteran at risk;(ii) the individual is missing due to the individual's physical or mental health condition;(iii) the missing individual poses a threat to the missing individual's health and safety or the health and safety of another; and(iv) there is sufficient information available to disseminate that could assist in locating the missing 20250SB0358PN0294 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual.(3) The notification under this subsection shall include a description of the person and other information as deemed appropriate.(4) For purposes of this subsection, the term "veteran at risk" means a veteran or an active-duty member of the armed forces, the National Guard or the military reserve forces of the United States who is known, based on the information provided by the person reporting the missing person, to be suffering from, or to have a history of, physical or mental health issues, including traumatic brain injury, neurocognitive disorders, post-traumatic stress disorder, suicide attempts or impulses or substance use disorder related to his or her military service.Section 5. Immunity.* * *(b) Good Samaritan immunity.--Any person who provides, obtains or attempts to provide or obtain assistance for a child who is the subject of a Pennsylvania Amber Alert System notice [or], a person who is the subject of a Missing Endangered Person Advisory or a person who is the subject of a Pennsylvania Green Alert System notice shall be immune from civil liability for acts or omissions in providing or obtaining or attempting to provide or obtain assistance except for acts or omissions intended to cause harm and for which the law does not recognize justification or that constitute gross negligence or willful, wanton or reckless conduct.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0358PN0294 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728